Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-222
Liability for preincorporation transactions.

(MBCA 2.04) All persons
purporting to act as or on behalf of a corporation, knowing there was no incorporation
under the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, are jointly and severally
liable for all liabilities created while so acting.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 22.
January 1, 2017